Utah statutes.
45-1-306.   Notice given in broadcast -- Restrictions.

(1)  Any state or other public officer who is required by law to publish any notice may supplement publication of the notice by causing the time, place and nature of the notice to be broadcast at such times and intervals as determined suitable when in his judgment, the public interest is or will be served.

(2)  The material broadcast shall include only the time, place, and nature of the notice.

(3)  In the broadcast of any notice or material authorized under this act, no reference by name or the use of the voice or likeness of any person who is a candidate for elective public office at the time of the broadcast shall be allowed.

(4)  Notices by political subdivisions of this state shall be made only by stations whose basic broadcast coverage encompasses the county or counties in which the notice is required to be given.

